Utah statutes.
63A-3-506.   Allocation of funds.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), the money collected by the office less the office's fees shall be allocated on a prorated basis to the various revenue types that generated the accounts receivable.

(2)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (1):

(a)  federal cost allocation requirements for specific accounts receivable related to programs that are supported by federal funds take precedence over other cost allocation methods provided in this section; and

(b)  the office shall use interest and fees collected on past due accounts receivable as provided in Section 63A-3-505.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 79, 2011 General Session

